test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-matow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mâto - cry : # Ordinary AI verb - Wolvengrey p. 396; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36

     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâton
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâton
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâtow
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: mâtoyiwa
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâtonân
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimâtonaw, kimâtonânaw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâtonâwâw
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâtowak

     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-mâton, nikîmâton]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-mâton, kikîmâton]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mâtow, kîmâtow]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-mâtoyiwa, kîmâtoyiwa]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-mâtonân, nikîmâtonân]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-mâtonaw, kikîmâtonaw, kikî-mâtonânaw, kikîmâtonânaw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-mâtonâwâw, kikîmâtonâwâw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mâtowak, kîmâtowak]
     
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-mâton, nikamâton]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-mâton, kikamâton]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-mâtow, kamâtow]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-mâtoyiwa, kamâtoyiwa]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-mâtonân, nikamâtonân]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-mâtonaw, kikamâtonaw, kikamâtonânaw, kika-mâtonânaw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-mâtonâwâw, kikamâtonâwâw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-mâtowak, kamâtowak]
     
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-mâton, niwîmâton]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-mâton, kiwîmâton]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-mâtow, wîmâtow]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-mâtoyiwa, wîmâtoyiwa]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-mâtonân, niwîmâtonân]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-mâtonaw, kiwîmâtonaw, kiwî-mâtonânaw, kiwîmâtonânaw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-mâtonâwâw, kiwîmâtonâwâw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-mâtowak, wîmâtowak]
     
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mâtoyân, êmâtoyân]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mâtoyan, êmâtoyan]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mâtot, êmâtot]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mâtoyit, êmâtoyit]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mâtoyâhk, êmâtoyâhk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mâtoyahk, êmâtoyahk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mâtoyêk, êmâtoyêk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mâtocik, êmâtocik]
     
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mâtoyân, êmâtoyân]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mâtoyan, êmâtoyan]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mâtot, êmâtot]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mâtoyit, êmâtoyit]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mâtoyâhk, êmâtoyâhk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mâtoyahk, êmâtoyahk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mâtoyêk, êmâtoyêk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mâtocik, êmâtocik]
         
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kî-mâtoyân, êkîmâtoyân]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kî-mâtoyan, êkîmâtoyan]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-mâtot, êkîmâtot]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-mâtoyit, êkîmâtoyit]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kî-mâtoyâhk, êkîmâtoyâhk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kî-mâtoyahk, êkîmâtoyahk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kî-mâtoyêk, êkîmâtoyêk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-mâtocik, êkîmâtocik]
     
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [ê-wî-mâtoyân, êwîmâtoyân]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [ê-wî-mâtoyan, êwîmâtoyan]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [ê-wî-mâtot, êwîmâtot]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-mâtoyit, êwîmâtoyit]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [ê-wî-mâtoyâhk, êwîmâtoyâhk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [ê-wî-mâtoyahk, êwîmâtoyahk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [ê-wî-mâtoyêk, êwîmâtoyêk]
     PV/e+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [ê-wî-mâtocik, êwîmâtocik]
    
    
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwîwîcimâtomâw, niwî-wîci-mâtomâw] # COMM SET I
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwîwîcimâtomâw, kiwî-wîci-mâtomâw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwîwîcimâtomânân, niwî-wîci-mâtomânân]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwîwîcimâtomânaw, kiwî-wîci-mâtomânaw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwîwîcimâtomâwâw, kiwî-wîci-mâtomâwâw]
     
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwîwîcimâtomâwak, niwî-wîci-mâtomâwak] # COMM SET I-Pl
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtomâwak, kiwî-wîci-mâtomâwak]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwîwîcimâtomânânak, niwî-wîci-mâtomânânak]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtomânawak, kiwî-wîci-mâtomânawak]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtomâwâwak, kiwî-wîci-mâtomâwâwak]

     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwîwîcimâtomin, kiwî-wîci-mâtomin] # COMM SET II
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtominân, kiwî-wîci-mâtominân]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwîwîcimâtominâwâw, kiwî-wîci-mâtominâwâw]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtominân, kiwî-wîci-mâtominân]


     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimâtomêw, wî-wîci-mâtomêw] # COMM SET III
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimâtomêwak, wî-wîci-mâtomêwak]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimâtomêyiwa, wî-wîci-mâtomêyiwa]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimâtomimêw, wî-wîci-mâtomimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcimâtomimêwak, wî-wîci-mâtomimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwîwîcimâtomimâwa, niwî-wîci-mâtomimâwa] # COMM SET IV
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtomimâwa, kiwî-wîci-mâtomimâwa]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwîwîcimâtomimânâna, niwî-wîci-mâtomimânâna]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtomimânawa, kiwî-wîci-mâtomimânawa]
     mâtow+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcimâtomimâwâwa, kiwî-wîci-mâtomimâwâwa]
    
     
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mâtoyâni
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: mâtoyani
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâtoci
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mâtoyici
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mâtoyâhki
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [mâtoyahko, mâtoyahki]
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mâtoyêko
     mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâtotwâwi
     
     


     mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâto
     mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâtotân
     mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâtok
     
     mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâtohkan
     mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâtohkahk
     mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâtohkêk
